Utah statutes.
31A-22-1705.   False or misleading practices.

(1)  A person may not knowingly request or require the issuance of a certificate of insurance from an insurer, insurance producer, or policyholder that contains false or misleading information concerning an insurance policy to which the certificate of insurance refers.

(2)  A person may not knowingly prepare or issue a certificate of insurance that:

(a)  contains false or misleading information; or

(b)  purports to affirmatively or negatively alter, amend, or extend the coverage provided by an insurance policy to which the certificate of insurance refers.

(3) (a)  A person may not prepare, issue, or request an opinion letter or other document, either in addition to or in lieu of a certificate of insurance that is inconsistent with this part.

(b)  An insurer or insurance producer may prepare or issue an addendum to a certificate of insurance that clarifies or explains the coverage provided by an insurance policy if the addendum complies with this part.

